Hawaii statutes.
§163D-6 Subsidiaries; establishment.
(a) The corporation may exercise its powers through one or more subsidiary
corporations. The corporation, by resolution, may direct any of its members,
officers, or employees to organize a subsidiary corporation pursuant to either
chapter 414 or chapter 414D; provided that the organization of a subsidiary
corporation shall not adversely affect the federal tax status of the interest
on any bonds issued to finance any project or project facility. The resolution
shall prescribe the purposes for which the subsidiary corporation is
established. The subsidiary corporation shall remain a subsidiary of the
corporation as long as more than one-half of its voting shares are owned or
held by the corporation, or a majority of its directors are designated by the
corporation; provided that the corporation shall not convey or otherwise
dispose of any subsidiary corporation or surrender the right to designate a
majority of the directors of any subsidiary corporation if the sale or surrender
has an adverse affect on the federal tax status of the interest on any bonds
issued to finance any project or project facility. The subsidiary corporation
may be operated, maintained, and enhanced at the full discretion of the
corporation or its designee.

(b) If the corporation acquires the assets of
a private or other corporation, then, notwithstanding any law to the contrary:

(1) Neither the corporation nor any subsidiary
corporation vested with the assets shall be subject to chapter 91 with respect
to the assets;

(2) Employees retained to operate the assets shall
not be subject to chapter 76;

(3) Assets constituting real property interest shall
not be subject to chapter 171;

(4) No investment, loan, or use of funds by the
corporation or a subsidiary corporation vested with the assets shall be subject
to chapter 42F or 103; and

(5) Neither the corporation nor a subsidiary
corporation vested with the assets shall constitute a public utility or be
subject to the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission under chapter
269.

(c) The corporation may transfer to any
subsidiary corporation any moneys, any real, personal, or mixed property, or
any project, in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Each
subsidiary corporation shall have all the powers of the corporation. [L 1994, c
264, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 111, §6; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2002, c 40,
§4; am L 2004, c 216, §18]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next